Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.910

Construction of other laws.

All acts or parts of acts which are inconsistent or conflicting with the provisions of this chapter, are hereby repealed or modified accordingly. No provision of this chapter shall be construed as repealing or anywise limiting or affecting the jurisdiction of district judges under the general laws of this state.

[ 1987 c 202 s 199; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.910. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 28.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.